Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-535
Person, defined.

As used in sections 25-535 to 25-541, person includes an individual, executor, administrator, personal representative, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, association, or other legal or commercial entity, whether or not a citizen or domiciliary of this state and whether or not organized under the laws of this state.

Laws 1967, c. 143, § 1, p. 439;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 167.

Under this and succeeding sections where copies of complaint, summons, and interrogatories were sent by registered mail to limited partnership defendant at its foreign office, Nebraska long-arm statute was satisfied. Blum v. Kawaguchi, Ltd., 331 F.Supp. 216 (D. Neb. 1971).